Virginia statutes. Title 63.2. Welfare (Social Services).
Article 1. General Provisions.
§ 63.2-1712.
Offenses; penalty.

Any person, and each officer and each member of the governing board of any association or corporation that operates an assisted living facility, adult day care center or child welfare agency, is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor if he:

Interferes with any representative of the Commissioner in the discharge of his duties under this subtitle;

Makes to the Commissioner or any representative of the Commissioner any report or statement, with respect to the operation of any assisted living facility, adult day care center or child welfare agency, that is known by such person to be false or untrue;

Operates or engages in the conduct of an assisted living facility, adult day care center or child welfare agency without first obtaining a license as required by this subtitle or after such license has been revoked or suspended or has expired and not been renewed. No violation shall occur if the facility, center, or agency has applied to the Department for renewal prior to the expiration date of the license. Every day’s violation of this subdivision shall constitute a separate offense; or

Operates or engages in the conduct of an assisted living facility, adult day care center, or child welfare agency serving more persons than the maximum stipulated in the license.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 63-227, 63-252; 1954, c. 259; 1968, c. 578, §§ 63.1-182, 63.1-215; 1973, c. 227; 1992, c. 356, § 63.1-194.12; 1993, cc. 957, 993; 2002, c. 747; 2019, c. 449.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 449, in the introductory paragraph, substituted “is guilty” for “shall be guilty”; and in subdivision 3, inserted “or suspended.”

§ 63.2-1713.
Misleading advertising prohibited.

No assisted living facility, adult day care center or child welfare agency shall make, publish, disseminate, circulate, or place before the public or cause, directly or indirectly, to be made, published, disseminated, circulated or placed before the public in this Commonwealth, in a newspaper or other publication; in the form of a book, notice, handbill, poster, blueprint, map, bill, tag, label, circular, pamphlet, or letter; or via electronic mail, website, automatic mailing list services (listservs), newsgroups, facsimile, chat rooms; or in any other way an advertisement of any sort regarding services or anything so offered to the public, which advertisement contains any promise, assertion, representation or statement of fact that is untrue, deceptive or misleading.

History.

1993, cc. 730, 742, § 63.1-201.1; 2002, c. 747.

§ 63.2-1714.
Duty of attorneys for the Commonwealth.

It shall be the duty of the attorney for the Commonwealth of every county and city to prosecute all violations of this subtitle.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 63-227, 63-253; 1954, c. 259; 1968, c. 578, §§ 63.1-182, 63.1-216; 1973, c. 227; 1992, c. 356, § 63.1-194.12; 1993, cc. 957, 993; 2002, c. 747.